Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska17-965
Facility fund; established; custodian.

Whenever a city or village acquires a facility as provided in sections 17-961 to 17-966, there shall be established a facility fund of which the treasurer of such city or village shall be the custodian. All funds received by gift or devise or raised by taxation, as provided in such sections, shall be paid into such fund.

Laws 1945, c. 31, § 5, p. 150;

Laws 1957, c. 36, § 4, p. 202;

Laws 1965, c. 72, § 4, p. 295;

Laws 1992, LB 1240, § 18.